Florida, session 2026, SB512.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 15 1002.71, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 16 1002.71âFunding; financial and attendance reporting.â 17 (3)(a)âEach private prekindergarten provider and public 18 school delivering the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 19 Program shall be paid a separate base student allocation per 20 full-time equivalent student as in the Voluntary Prekindergarten 21 Education Program shall be provided in the General 22 Appropriations Act. 23 1.âBeginning with the 2026-2027 program year, the base 24 student allocation for a school-year prekindergarten program and 25 for a summer prekindergarten program may not be less than the 26 amount appropriated for the previous program year, adjusted 27 annually on July 1 by the percentage change in the Consumer 28 Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the most recent calendar 29 year, published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United 30 States Department of Labor, not to exceed 5 percent each year. 31 The base student allocation for a school-year program shall be 32 equal for each student, regardless of whether the student is 33 enrolled in a school-year prekindergarten program delivered by a 34 public school or a private prekindergarten provider. The base 35 student allocation for a summer prekindergarten program shall be 36 equal for each student, regardless of whether the student is 37 enrolled in a summer prekindergarten program delivered by a 38 public school or private prekindergarten provider. 39 2.âThe Division of Early Learning shall annually publish on 40 its website the adjusted base student allocation and provide the 41 amount of the allocation to each early learning coalition no 42 later than May 1 for use in the following program year. 43 3.âThe Legislature may provide a greater base student 44 allocation than calculated under subparagraph 1. or additional 45 supplements for the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program 46 in the General Appropriations Act. 47 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.